New York, session 2025-2026, A8250.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 144-a of the executive law, as amended by chapter 2 371 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 144-a. Eligible professions for the purchase, sale, and use of body 4 armor. The secretary of state in consultation with the division of crim- 5 inal justice services, the division of homeland security and emergency 6 services, the department of corrections and community supervision, the 7 division of the state police, and the office of general services shall 8 promulgate rules and regulations to establish criteria for eligible 9 professions requiring the use of body armor, as such term is defined in 10 subdivision two of section 270.20 of the penal law. Such professions 11 shall include those in which the duties may expose the individual to 12 serious physical injury that may be prevented or mitigated by the wear- 13 ing of body armor which shall include, but not be limited to, judges and 14 justices. Such rules and regulations shall also include a process by 15 which an individual or entity may request that the profession in which 16 they engage be added to the list of eligible professions, a process by 17 which the department shall approve such professions, and a process by 18 which individuals and entities may present proof of engagement in eligi- 19 ble professions when purchasing body armor. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11785-01-5